Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.660

Review and objection procedures—No presumption established.

It is the express policy of the legislature that establishment of procedures for review of administrative rules by the legislature and the notice of objection required by RCW 34.05.630(3) and 34.05.640(2) in no way serves to establish a presumption as to the legality or constitutionality of a rule in any subsequent judicial proceedings interpreting such rules.

[ 2001 c 64 s 2; 1988 c 288 s 606; 1981 c 324 s 10. Formerly RCW 34.04.260.]

NOTES:

Legislative affirmation—Severability—1981 c 324: See notes following RCW 34.05.010.